src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
! TODO
LEXICON Pronouns
    ! Relative
    ya+Pron+Rel+Inan:ya         Cases   "which, what" ;
    yë+Pron+Rel+Anim:ye         Cases-E "who, whom" ;
    
    ! Personal
    ni+Pron+Sing+1:ni           Cases   "I, me" ;
    inyë+Pron+Sing+1+Emp:inye   Cases   "I, me" ;

    let+Pron+Dual+2:let         Cases   "you (Dual)" ;
    lë+Pron+Plur+2:le           Cases   "you (Plural)" ;
    lé+Pron+Plur+2+Emp:lé       Cases   "you (Plural)" ;

    sa+Pron+Sing+3+Inan:sa      Cases   "it" ;
    së+Pron+Sing+3+Anim:se      Cases-E "he, him, she, her, it" ;
    te+Pron+Plur+3:te           Cases-E "they, them" ;

    ! Interrogative
    man+Pron+Int:man            #       "who, what" ;
